test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VAI_N_CNJ_gwekishin_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI+Cnj - N - gwekshin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum prt     dub
     
     #this is extrapolated from book
     #cons v book is inherited from VV# (boodwe)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1: gwekshinaanh
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2: gwekshinan 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3: gwekshing
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+4: gwekshinnid #gwekshinid? (epenthesis i or nn->n?)
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+X: gwekshining #gwekshing? (epenthesis i or nn->n?)
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1+Pl: gwekshinaang
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+1+Pl: gwekshinang 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Pl: gwekshineg
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+Pl: gwekshinwaad #even parity stem = awaad?
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1+Prt: gwekshinaambaanh
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Prt: gwekshinmba #cons 
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Prt: gwekshinamba #book 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+Prt: gwekshingba
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+4+Prt: gwekshinnipa
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+X+Prt: gwekshinngiba
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt: gwekshinaangba
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt: gwekshinngoba #cons, giba might be attested
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt: gwekshinngba #book 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt: gwekshinegba
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+Pl+Prt: gwekshinwaapa #even parity stem = awaapa?
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct??
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1+Dub: gwekshinwaane
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Dub: gwekshinwane #cons
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Dub: gwekshinwane #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+Dub: gwekshin'gwenh #'
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+4+Dub: gwekshinnigwenh
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+X+Dub: gwekshinngwenh #even parity agwenh or igwenh?
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1+Pl+Dub: gwekshinwaange
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Dub: gwekshinwangwe #no coda w-del in model
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Dub: gwekshinngwe #book 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Pl+Dub: gwekshinwegwe
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+Pl+Dub: gwekshinwaagwenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwaambaane
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwambne #book has ambane (no /aw.../) (probably typo -VR)
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+Prt+Dub: gwekshin'gobne #'
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+4+Prt+Dub: gwekshinnigbane
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+X+Prt+Dub: gwekshinngobne
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwaangbane
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwangbane #cons #no coda w-del
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwngobane #book #no coda w-del
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwegbane
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+3+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwaagbane
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1: gwekshinzwaanh
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2: gwekshinzwan 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3: gwekshinzig 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+4: gwekshinznid #also sig
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+X: gwekshinzing
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl: gwekshinzwaang
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl: gwekshinzwang 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl: gwekshinzweg
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl: gwekshinzgwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3 #sii forms extrapolated conservatively
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1+Prt:      [gwekshinzwaambaanh, gwekshinziiwaambaanh]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Prt:      [gwekshinzwamba    , gwekshinziiwmba ]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+Prt:      [gwekshinzpa       , gwekshinziipa] #book only sii (all probably accidental gaps -VR)
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Prt:    [gwekshinznipa     , gwekshinziinpa] #book only sii
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+X+Prt:      [gwekshinzngiba    , gwekshinziingba] #book only sii
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:   [gwekshinzwaangba  , gwekshinziiwaangba]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt: [gwekshinzwangba   , gwekshinziiwngoba ] #giba might be attested
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:   [gwekshinzwegba    , gwekshinziiwegba]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl+Prt:   [gwekshinzwaapa    , gwekshinziiwaapa]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4 #this is supposed to be changed conjunct??
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1+Dub:          [gwekshinzwaane    ,  gwekshinziiwaane]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Dub:          [gwekshinzwane     ,  gwekshinziiwne]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+Dub:          [gwekshinzgwenh    ,  gwekshinziigwenh]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Dub:        [gwekshinznigwenh  ,  gwekshinziin'gwenh] #'
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+X+Dub:          [gwekshinzngwenh   ,  gwekshinziingwenh]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:       [gwekshinzwaange   ,  gwekshinziiwaange]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Dub:     [gwekshinzwangwe   ,  gwekshinziiwngwe ]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:       [gwekshinzwegwe    ,  gwekshinziiwegwe]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl+Dub:       [gwekshinzwaagwenh ,  gwekshinziiwaagwenh]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4 
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1+Prt+Dub:      [gwekshinzwaambaane, gwekshinziiwaambaane]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Prt+Dub:      [gwekshinzwambne   , gwekshinziiwmbane] #cons
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Prt+Dub:      [gwekshinzwmbane   , gwekshinziiwmbane] #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+Prt+Dub:      [gwekshinzgobne    , gwekshinziigbane]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub:    [gwekshinznigbane  , gwekshinziin'gobne] #'cons
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub:    [gwekshinzngbane  , gwekshinziingobne] #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+X+Prt+Dub:      [gwekshinzngobne   , gwekshinziingbane] #expected
     #gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+X+Prt+Dub:      [gwekshinzngibne   , gwekshinziingbane] #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub:   [gwekshinzwaangbane, gwekshinziiwaangbane]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: [gwekshinzwangbane , gwekshinziiwngobne ] #book ne -> nn
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub:   [gwekshinzwegbane  , gwekshinziiwegbane]
     gwekshin+VAI+Cnj+Neg+3+Pl+Prt+Dub:   [gwekshinzwaagbane , gwekshinziiwaagbane]
     
